California, session 20252026, AB922.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The California Constitution provides that the University of California constitutes a public trust administered by the Regents of the University of California, a corporation in the form of a board, with full powers of organization and government, subject to legislative control only for specified purposes, including, among others, as may be necessary to ensure the security of its funds.(b) The University of California is committed to providing a safe and secure environment for the university community; community, protecting its property and assets; assets, and upholding the reputation and integrity of the University of California.(c) To support these efforts and to minimize the risk to the University of California, a criminal background check is required for positions that the University of California has determined to be Critical Positions after the candidate has received a conditional offer of employment. The University of California uses information received from criminal background checks only to determine eligibility for employment.(d) This act does not change the University of California’s existing background check policies and practices. The United States Department of Justice approved its last extension of the grace period of the State Employee applicant type that the University of California is qualified to use for criminal background checks, which will no longer be available after January 1, 2027. Therefore, to enable the University of California to continue receiving criminal conviction history from the United States Department of Justice, there must be express statutory authorization to do so.(e) This act authorizes the University of California to continue current practices requiring criminal background checks for University of California-determined Critical Positions, as defined in its Personnel Policies for Staff Members, to be completed by the United States Department of Justice during the final stages of the recruitment process for prospective staff employees, contractors, and volunteers. The University of California defines Critical Positions as staff positions that have sensitive administrative, programmatic, or managerial duties and responsibilities that could potentially cause human, financial financial, or property loss loss, or other significant risk to the University of California.SEC. 2. Section 92612.3 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 92612.2, to read:92612.3. (a) The University of California may require background checks, to be completed by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (b), during the final stages of the recruitment process for a prospective staff employee, contractor, or volunteer.(b) (1) The University of California shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images of a prospective staff employee, contractor, or volunteer, that the University of California obtains pursuant to subdivision (a), and related information required by the Department of Justice, for purposes of a state and federal level criminal history background check in accordance with subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(2) The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response, or both if applicable, to the University of California pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(c) (1) When the University of California knows that the individual for whom the notification service is requested is no longer in a position for which it is permitted, the University of California shall notify the Department of Justice immediately to terminate the notification for that individual. The department shall terminate notification for the individual upon receipt.(2) The University of California shall, not less than every six months, verify that each individual for whom the notification has not been terminated, is still in a position with the University of California.(3) If the University of California receives subsequent arrest notification for an individual unknown to it, or for whom the University of California terminated the service, the University of California shall immediately inform the department that the individual is unknown to it or that the University of California terminated the notification requests for that individual.(c)(d) This section does not authorize hiring practices that are inconsistent with the requirements of Section 12952 of the Government Code.